Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.240

Representation by attorney—Department represented by attorney general.

A person subject to proceedings under this chapter may appear or be represented by counsel. The department shall be represented by the attorney general in any proceeding under this chapter.

[ 1983 c 124 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.